Maryland, session 2026, HB0558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1304.
(a) [In this section, “Festival” means the Prince George’s County Wine Festival.
(b) (1)] There is a [Prince George’s County Wine Festival license] WINE
FESTIVAL LICENSE.
[(2) The Board may issue one license each year.]
– 1 –

Ch. 824 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(c)] (B) The Board may issue the license to a holder of a retail license, Class 3
winery license, or Class 4 limited winery license.
[(d)] (C) The license authorizes the license holder to display and sell wine that
is:
(1) manufactured and processed in any state; and
(2) distributed in the State when the license application is filed.
[(e)] (D) A license holder shall display and sell wine:
(1) for on– and off–premises consumption; and
(2) during the hours and days designated for the [Festival] WINE
FESTIVAL.
[(f)] (E) (1) The Board shall:
(i) choose [a] THE location for the [Festival] WINE FESTIVAL that:
1. is not in the 24th Legislative District; and
2. is not already licensed; and
(ii) ensure that the primary focus of the [Festival] WINE FESTIVAL
is the promotion of Maryland wine.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, each year the Board may
choose [1 weekend] THE WEEKENDS, Friday through Sunday, inclusive, for the [Festival]
WINE FESTIVALS.
(3) The [weekend] WEEKENDS chosen for [the Festival] WINE FESTIVALS
may not:
(i) be within 14 days before or after the dates chosen for the
Maryland Wine Festival in Carroll County; or
(ii) conflict with the dates chosen for the:
1. Anne Arundel County Beer and Wine Festival;
2. Calvert County Wine Festival;
3. Charles County Beer and Wine Festival; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 824
4. Howard County Wine Festival.
[(g)] (F) The license holder may hold another license of a different class or
nature.
[(h)] (G) Wine displayed and sold shall be:
(1) invoiced to the license holder by a licensed wholesaler, Class 3 winery,
or Class 4 limited winery; and
(2) delivered to the [Festival] WINE FESTIVAL from the licensed premises
of the wholesaler, Class 3 winery, or Class 4 limited winery.
[(i)] (H) A holder of a wholesale, Class 3 winery, or Class 4 limited winery
license may enter into an agreement with the license holder to:
(1) deliver wine not earlier than 2 days before the effective date of the
license; and
(2) accept returns not later than 2 days after the expiration date of the
license.
[(j)] (I) The Board may set the license fee.
[(k)] (J) The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –